Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-585.1:1.
Transitional Rate Period: review of rates, terms and conditions for utility generation facilities.

No biennial reviews of the rates, terms, and conditions for any service of a Phase I Utility, as defined in § 56-585.1, shall be conducted at any time by the Commission for the three successive 12-month test periods beginning January 1, 2014, and ending
December 31, 2016. No biennial reviews of the rates, terms, and conditions for any service of a Phase II Utility, as defined in § 56-585.1, shall be conducted at any time by the Commission for the two successive 12-month test periods
beginning January 1, 2015, and ending December 31, 2016. Such test periods beginning January 1, 2014, and ending December 31, 2017, for a Phase I Utility, and beginning January 1, 2015, and ending December 31, 2016, for a Phase
II Utility, are collectively referred to herein as the “Transitional Rate Period.” Review of recovery of fuel and purchase power costs shall continue during the Transitional Rate Period in accordance with § 56-249.6. Any biennial
review of the rates, terms, and conditions for any service of a Phase II Utility occurring in 2015 during the Transitional Rate Period shall be solely a review of the utility’s earnings on its rates for generation and distribution
services for the two 12-month test periods ending December 31, 2014, and a determination of whether any credits to customers are due for such test periods pursuant to subdivision A 8 b of § 56-585.1. After the conclusion of the
Transitional Rate Period, reviews of the utility’s rates for generation and distribution services shall resume for a Phase I Utility in 2020, with the first such proceeding utilizing the three successive 12-month test periods beginning
January 1, 2017, and ending December 31, 2019. After the conclusion of the Transitional Rate Period, reviews of the utility’s rates for generation and distribution services shall resume for a Phase II Utility in 2021, with the
first such proceeding utilizing the four successive 12-month test periods beginning January 1, 2017, and ending December 31, 2020. Consistent with this provision, (i) no biennial review filings shall be made by an investor-owned
incumbent electric utility in the years 2016 through 2019, inclusive, and (ii) no adjustment to an investor-owned incumbent electric utility’s existing tariff rates, including any rates adopted pursuant to § 56-235.2, shall be
made between the beginning of the Transitional Rate Period and the conclusion of the first review after the conclusion of the Transitional Rate Period, except as may be provided pursuant to § 56-245 or 56-249.6 or subdivisions
A 4, 5, or 6 of § 56-585.1.

During the Transitional Rate Period, pursuant to § 56-36, the Commission shall have the right at all times to inspect the books, papers and documents of any investor-owned incumbent electric utility and to require from such companies, from time to time,
special reports and statements, under oath, concerning their business.

Commencing in 2016 and concluding in 2018, the State Corporation Commission, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, shall conduct a proceeding every two years to determine the fair rate of return on common equity to be used by a Phase I Utility as
the general rate of return applicable to rate adjustment clauses under subdivisions A 5 or A 6 of § 56-585.1. A Phase I Utility’s filing in such proceedings shall be made on or before March 31 of 2016, and 2018. C. 1. Commencing
in 2016 and concluding in 2018, the State Corporation Commission, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, shall conduct a proceeding every two years to determine the fair rate of return on common equity to be used by
a Phase I Utility as the general rate of return applicable to rate adjustment clauses under subdivisions A 5 or A 6 of § 56-585.1. A Phase I Utility’s filing in such proceedings shall be made on or before March 31 of 2016,
and 2018.

Commencing in 2017 and concluding in 2019, the State Corporation Commission, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, shall conduct a proceeding every two years to determine the fair rate of return on common equity to be used by a Phase II Utility
as the general rate of return applicable to rate adjustment clauses under subdivisions A 5 or A 6 of § 56-585.1. A Phase II utility’s filing in such proceedings shall be made on or before March 31 of 2017 and 2019.

Such fair rate of return shall be calculated pursuant to the methodology set forth in subdivisions A 2 a and b of § 56-585.1 and shall utilize the utility’s actual end-of-test-period capital structure and cost of capital, as well as a 12-month test period
ending December 31 immediately preceding the year in which the proceeding is conducted. The Commission’s final order in such a proceeding shall be entered no later than eight months after the date of filing, with any adjustment
to the fair rate of return for applicable rate adjustment clauses under subdivisions A 5 and 6 of § 56-585.1 taking effect on the date of the Commission’s final order in the proceeding, utilizing rate adjustment clause
true-up protocols as the Commission may in its discretion determine. Such proceeding shall concern only the issue of the determination of such fair rate of return to be used for rate adjustment clauses under subdivisions
A 5 and 6 of § 56-585.1, and such determination shall have no effect on rates other than those applicable to such rate adjustment clauses; however, after the final such proceeding for a utility has been concluded, the fair
combined rate of return on common equity so determined therein shall also be deemed equal to the fair combined rate of return on common equity to be used in such utility’s first review proceeding conducted after the end
of the utility’s Transitional Rate Period to review such utility’s earnings on its rates for generation and distribution services for the historic test periods.

In furtherance of rate stability during the Transitional Rate Period, any Phase II Utility carrying a prior period deferred fuel expense recovery balance on its books and records as of December 31, 2014, shall not recover from customers 50 percent of
any such balance outstanding as of December 31, 2014, and the State Corporation Commission shall implement as soon as practicable reductions in the fuel factor rate of any such Phase II Utility to reflect the nonrecovery of any
such fuel expense as well as any reduction in the fuel factor associated with the Phase II Utility’s current period forecasted fuel expense over recovery for the 2014-2015 fuel year and projected fuel expense for the 2015-2016
fuel year.

Except for early retirement plans identified by the utility in an integrated resource plan filed with the State Corporation Commission by September 1, 2014, for utility generation plants, an investor-owned incumbent electric utility shall not permanently
retire an electric power generation facility from service during the Transitional Rate Period without first obtaining the approval of the State Corporation Commission, upon petition from such investor-owned incumbent electric utility,
and a finding by the State Corporation Commission that the retirement determination is reasonable and prudent. During the Transitional Rate Period, an investor-owned incumbent electric utility shall recover the following costs,
as recorded per books by the utility for financial reporting purposes and accrued against income, only through its existing tariff rates for generation or distribution services, except such costs as may be recovered pursuant to
§ 56-245, § 56-249.6 or subdivisions A 4, A 5, or A 6 of § 56-585.1: (i) costs associated with asset impairments related to early retirement determinations for utility generation facilities resulting from the implementation of
carbon emission guidelines for existing electric power generation facilities that the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has issued pursuant to § 111(d) of the Clean Air Act; (ii) costs associated with severe weather events;
and (iii) costs associated with natural disasters.

During the Transitional Rate Period:

The State Corporation Commission shall submit a report and make recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly annually on or before December 1 of each year assessing the updated integrated resource plan of any investor-owned incumbent electric
utility. The report shall include an analysis of, among other matters, the amount, reliability, and type of generation facilities needed to serve Virginia native load compared to what is then available to serve such load
and what may be available to serve such load in the future in view of market conditions and current and pending state and federal environmental regulations. As a part of such report, the State Corporation Commission shall
update its estimate of the impact upon electric rates in Virginia of the implementation of carbon emission guidelines for existing electric power generation facilities that the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has issued
pursuant to § 111(d) of the federal Clean Air Act. The State Corporation Commission shall submit copies of such annual reports to the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee
on Commerce and Labor and the Chairman of the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation; and

The Department of Environmental Quality shall submit a report and make recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly annually on or before December 1 of each year concerning the implementation of carbon emission guidelines for existing electric
power generation facilities that the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has issued pursuant to § 111(d) of the federal Clean Air Act. The report shall include an analysis of, among other matters, the impact of such federal
regulations on the operation of any investor-owned incumbent electric utility’s electric power generation facilities and any changes, interdiction, or suspension of such regulations. The Department of Environmental Quality
shall submit copies of such annual reports to the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor and the Chairman of the Commission on Electric Utility
Regulation.

The construction or purchase by an investor-owned incumbent utility of one or more generation facilities with at least one megawatt of generating capacity, and with an aggregate rated capacity that does not exceed 5,000 megawatts, including rooftop solar
installations with a capacity of not less than 50 kilowatts, and with an aggregate capacity of 50 megawatts, that use energy derived from sunlight or from wind and are located in the Commonwealth or off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic
shoreline, regardless of whether any of such facilities are located within or without such utility’s service territory, is in the public interest, and in determining whether to approve such facility, the Commission shall liberally
construe the provisions of this section. Such utility shall utilize goods or services sourced, in whole or in part, from one or more Virginia businesses. The utility may propose a rate adjustment clause based on a market index
in lieu of a cost of service model for such facility. An investor-owned incumbent utility may enter into short-term or long-term power purchase contracts for the power derived from sunlight generated by such generation facility
prior to purchasing the generation facility.

To the extent that the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of §§ 56-249.6 and 56-585.1, the provisions of this section shall control.

History.
2015, c. 6; 2018, c. 296.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 6, cl. 2, subsections A through G, were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2015, c. 6, cl. 3 provides: “That the General Assembly finds that (i) competitive electric utility rates, reliable electric service, and energy independence are important public policy priorities; (ii) long-term stability of electric utility rates
is a competitive advantage for the Commonwealth’s economic development; (iii) during the transition period, existing electric power generation facilities that provide for reliable electric utility service in the Commonwealth should
remain in operation when prudent; (iv) the General Assembly should be regularly informed of utility generation resource plans in light of the challenges to existing electric power generation facilities; and (v) the enactments herein
are intended to promote balanced environmental management and rate stability, to protect the Commonwealth’s economy and its consumers of electric energy, including those energy-intensive customers who are most vulnerable and rate sensitive,
and to avoid threats to service reliability or the Commonwealth’s energy independence.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor”
in subdivisions F 1 and F 2. March 10, 2021.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296 deleted the introductory paragraph, which read “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 56-249.6 and 56-585.1”; rewrote subsection A; in subdivision C 3, substituted “first review” for “first biennial review”; in subsection G,
substituted “5,000 megawatts including rooftop solar installations with a capacity of not less than 50 kilowatts, and with an aggregate capacity of 50 megawatts” for “500 megawatts” and inserted “or from wind” and “or off the Commonwealth’s
Atlantic shoreline”; added subsection H; and made stylistic changes. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 56-585.1:2.
Pilot program for energy assistance and weatherization.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 56-249.6 and 56-585.1:

Each Phase I and II Utility shall conduct a pilot program for energy assistance and weatherization for low income, elderly, and disabled individuals in their respective service territories in the Commonwealth. Each pilot program shall be funded by the
utility and shall commence September 1, 2015. Each Phase I Utility shall continue such pilot program at no less than the existing levels of funding as of July 1, 2018, for each year that the utility provides such service. Each Phase
II Utility shall continue such pilot program at no less than $13 million for each year the utility is providing such service. The funding for the pilot programs established pursuant hereto for energy assistance and weatherization for
low-income, elderly, and disabled individuals in the service territory in the Commonwealth of each respective utility shall continue until the earlier of amendment or repeal of this section or July 1, 2028. Each such utility shall
report on the status of its pilot program, including the number of individuals served thereby, to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Chairman of the
Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor by July 1, 2016, and each year thereafter.

History.
2015, c. 6; 2018, c. 296.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 6, cl. 2, subsection H, was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2015, c. 6, cl. 3 provides: “That the General Assembly finds that (i) competitive electric utility rates, reliable electric service, and energy independence are important public policy priorities; (ii) long-term stability of electric utility rates
is a competitive advantage for the Commonwealth’s economic development; (iii) during the transition period, existing electric power generation facilities that provide for reliable electric utility service in the Commonwealth should
remain in operation when prudent; (iv) the General Assembly should be regularly informed of utility generation resource plans in light of the challenges to existing electric power generation facilities; and (v) the enactments herein
are intended to promote balanced environmental management and rate stability, to protect the Commonwealth’s economy and its consumers of electric energy, including those energy-intensive customers who are most vulnerable and rate sensitive,
and to avoid threats to service reliability or the Commonwealth’s energy independence.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees.”
March 10, 2021.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296 added the third through fifth sentences in the second paragraph. For applicability, see Editor’s note.